Nevada, session 83, SB76-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 597 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 23, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 23, inclusive, of this act, the
words and terms defined in sections 3 to 19, inclusive, of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Adult mattress” means any mattress other than a
toddler mattress, crib mattress or other sleep product for infants.
Sec. 4. “Carpet or rug” means a fabric product marketed or
intended for use as a floor covering in a household or business.
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. “Component” means an identifiable component of a
product, regardless of whether the manufacturer of the product is
the manufacturer of the component.
Sec. 7. “Cookware” means a durable houseware product that
is used in a residence or kitchen to prepare, dispense or store food
or beverages, including, without limitation, any pot, pan, skillet,
grill, baking sheet, baking mold, tray, bowl or cooking utensil.
Sec. 8. 1. “Cosmetic” means a product that is intended to
be rubbed onto or introduced into, poured, sprinkled, sprayed on
or otherwise applied to the human body for the purposes of
cleaning, cleansing, beautifying, promoting or altering the
appearance of a person, including, without limitation, any skin
moisturizer, perfume, lipstick, nail polish, eye or facial makeup,
shampoo, conditioner, permanent wave, hair dye or deodorant.
2. The term does not include:
(a) A product that requires a prescription for distribution or
dispensation; or
(b) Hydrofluoroolefins used as propellants in cosmetics.
-
*SB76_R2*

– 3 –
Sec. 9. “Fabric treatment” means a product applied to fabric
to give the fabric one or more characteristics, including, without
limitation, stain resistance or water resistance. The term does not
include hydrofluoroolefins used as propellants in fabric
treatments.
Sec. 10. “Food packaging” means a package or packaging
component that is used in direct contact with food and is
composed, in substantial part, of paper, paperboard or other
materials originally derived from plant fibers.
Sec. 11. 1. “Intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances” means perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances that a manufacturer has intentionally
added to a product and that have a functional or technical effect
on the product. The term includes, without limitation,
perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances that are intentional
breakdown products of an added chemical that also have a
functional or technical effect on the product.
2. The term does not include the use of recycled materials
which may contain perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances
due to the use of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances in
the original product.
Sec. 11.5. 1. “Juvenile product” means a product designed
by a manufacturer for use by an infant or child less than 12 years
of age, including, without limitation, a bassinet, child restraint
system for use in motor vehicles, changing pad, toddler mattress,
crib mattress or other sleep product for infants, high chair, infant
carrier, infant seat, polyurethane foam mat, pad or pillow, nap cot,
play mat, playpen or stroller.
2. The term does not include:
(a) Electronic products, including, without limitation, any
personal computer and any associated equipment, audio and video
equipment, calculator, wireless phone, gaming console, handheld
device incorporating a video screen or any associated peripheral
device such as a mouse, keyboard, power supply unit or power
cord;
(b) An internal component of a juvenile product that is not
designed or intended to come into direct contact with the skin or
mouth of a child as a result of the reasonably foreseeable use of
the product;
(c) An adult mattress; or
(d) An off-highway vehicle, as defined in NRS 490.060,
designed for use by a child, a replacement part for such an off-
highway vehicle and any protective clothing or equipment
intended for use by a child while operating such an off-highway
vehicle.
-
*SB76_R2*

– 4 –
Sec. 12. “Manufacturer” means a person that manufactures
or assembles a product. The term includes, without limitation, the
importer or first domestic distributor of the product if a product is
imported into the United States and the manufacturer does not
have a presence in the United States.
Sec. 13. “Package” means the material that is intended or
used to contain, protect, handle, deliver or present a product.
Sec. 14. “Packaging component” means an individual part
of a package, including, without limitation, the interior or exterior
blocking, bracing, cushioning, weatherproofing, exterior
strapping, coating, closure, ink or label.
Sec. 15. “Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 459.678.
Sec. 16. 1. “Product” means an item, and any component
of such an item, that is manufactured, assembled or otherwise
prepared for sale or distribution to a customer and that is sold or
distributed for personal, residential, commercial or industrial use,
including, without limitation, for use in making other products.
2. The term does not include:
(a) Any drug, medical device, biologic or diagnostic regulated
by the United States Food and Drug Administration or the United
States Department of Agriculture;
(b) Any drug, medical device, biologic, parasiticide or
diagnostic administered or used to treat animals regulated by the
United States Food and Drug Administration pursuant to the
Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. §§ 351 et seq.,
the United States Department of Agriculture pursuant to the
Virus-Serum-Toxin Act, 21 U.S.C. §§ 151 et seq. or the United
States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the Federal
Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §§ 136 et
seq.;
(c) A veterinary pesticide product approved by the United
States Environmental Protection Agency for use in animals;
(d) Medical food, as defined in section 5(b)(3) of the Orphan
Drug Act, 21 U.S.C. § 360ee(b)(3);
(e) Infant formula, as defined in NRS 597.990;
(f) Any packaging used for a product described in paragraphs
(a) to (e), inclusive; or
(g) A used product offered for sale or resale.
Sec. 17. “Textile” means any product made in whole or in
part from a natural or synthetic fiber, yarn or fabric, including,
without limitation, leather, cotton, silk, jute, hemp, wool, nylon or
polyester. The term does not include any textile used in a medical,
professional or industrial setting.
-
*SB76_R2*

– 5 –
Sec. 18. “Textile furnishing” means a type of textile intended
for use in households and businesses, including, without
limitation, any drapery, floor covering, furnishing, bedding, towel
or tablecloth. The term does not include a textile furnishing
intended for use in a medical, professional or industrial setting.
Sec. 19. “Upholstered furniture” means any article of
furniture that is:
1. Designed for sitting, resting or reclining; and
2. Wholly or partially stuffed with filling material.
Sec. 20. The provisions of sections 2 to 23, inclusive, of this
act do not apply to the extent that those provisions are preempted
by or conflict with federal law, including, without limitation, any
provision of federal law requiring the use of products that contain
intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances
or authorizing the use of intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances in a product or any product surface
that comes into contact with food or beverages.
Sec. 21. 1. A manufacturer shall not sell, offer for sale,
distribute for sale or distribute for use in this State any of the
following types of products if the product contains intentionally
added perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances:
(a) Carpets or rugs;
(b) Fabric treatments;
(c) Food packaging;
(d) Juvenile products;
(e) Cosmetics;
(f) Indoor textile furnishings; or
(g) Indoor upholstered furniture.
2. A manufacturer of the products described in subsection 1
may include on the product label a sticker suitable to the size of
the product label stating “NO PFAS” to inform the consumer that
the product does not contain intentionally added perfluoroalkyl
and polyfluoroalkyl substances.
3. The provisions of this section do not apply to:
(a) A product which contains perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances due to the use of recycled materials
containing perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances in the
original product;
(b) A carpet or rug that was manufactured or imported before
October 1, 2024; or
(c) Any other textile product, other than a carpet or rug, that
was manufactured or imported before October 1, 2024.
Sec. 22. 1. A manufacturer of cookware sold in this State
that contains intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances in the handle of the product or in any
-
*SB76_R2*

– 6 –
product surface that comes into contact with any food or
beverages shall:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, list the
presence of those substances on the product label. The list of such
substances must be prefaced by the phrase “This product
contains:”;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, include on
the product label a statement, in both English and Spanish, that
reads: “For more information about chemicals in this product,
visit” followed by:
(1) An Internet address for a website that provides
information about why the perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl
substances are intentionally added; and
(2) A quick response (QR) code or other machine-readable
code used for storing an Internet address for the website that
provides information about why the perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances are intentionally added;
(c) Include in any product listing for online sales in this State,
the information required to be included on the product label
pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b); and
(d) Ensure that the information required pursuant to
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) is clearly visible and legible to the
customer on the label and on the product listing for online sales.
2. A manufacturer of cookware:
(a) Shall not claim on the packaging for cookware that the
cookware is free of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances,
unless no individual perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl compound
has been intentionally added to the cookware.
(b) That does not contain intentionally added perfluoroalkyl
and polyfluoroalkyl substances may include on the product label a
sticker suitable to the size of the product stating “NO PFAS” to
inform the consumer that the product does not contain
intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances.
3. Cookware that meets the following requirements is exempt
from the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 1:
(a) The surface area of the cookware cannot fit a product label
of at least 2 square inches; and
(b) The cookware does not have:
(1) An exterior or wrapper on which a product label can
appear or be affixed; or
(2) A tag or other attachment with information about the
product attached to the cookware.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a
manufacturer shall not sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale or
distribute for use any cookware that contains one or more
-
*SB76_R2*

– 7 –
intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances
in the handle of the product or in any product surface that comes
into contact with food or beverages, unless the manufacturer and
the cookware comply with the requirements of this section.
Sec. 23. A person who willfully and knowingly violates the
provisions of section 21 or 22 of this act is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
Sec. 24. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 25. This act becomes effective on October 1, 2024.
H
-
*SB76_R2*